Vermont, session 2025-2026, H509.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendment to the charter of the City
of Winooski as set forth in this act. Voters approved the proposal of
amendment on March 4, 2025.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 19 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 19. CITY OF WINOOSKI
* * *
VT LEG #382621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.509
2025 Page 2 of 3
§ 304. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES
* * *
(b) Additional powers. In addition to powers otherwise conferred upon it
by law, the City, by the action of the Council or, if specifically required by law
or this charter, by the action of its voters, has the following powers and rights,
including:
* * *
(13)(A) To adopt by ordinance protections for residential tenants, as
defined in 9 V.S.A. chapter 137, from eviction without just cause. Just cause
shall include:
(i) a tenant’s material breach of a written rental agreement;
(ii) a tenant’s violation of State statutes regulating tenant
obligations in residential rental agreements;
(iii) nonpayment of rent; and
(iv) a tenant’s failure to accept written, reasonable, good faith
renewal terms.
(B) The ordinance shall:
(i) exclude from the definition of just cause the expiration of a
rental agreement as the sole grounds for termination of tenancy; and
(ii) exempt, subject to mitigation provisions, sublets, in-unit
rentals, and the following properties:
VT LEG #382621 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.509
2025 Page 3 of 3
(I) owner-occupied duplexes and triplexes;
(II) properties being withdrawn from the rental market,
including properties to be occupied by the owner or an immediate family
member as a primary residence; and
(III) properties in need of substantial renovations that preclude
occupancy.
(C) The ordinance shall include provisions that:
(i) Mitigate potential negative impacts on tenants and other
property owners, including requirements of adequate notice and reasonable
relocation expenses.
(ii) Provide for a reasonable probationary period after initial
occupancy.
(iii) Limit unreasonable rent increases to prevent de facto
evictions or nonrenewal. This subdivision (iii) shall not be construed to limit
rental rates beyond the purpose of preventing individual evictions.
(D) The ordinance shall define “reasonable” and “adequate notice” in
defining just cause and shall require that landlords provide notice of just cause
and other legal requirements as part of the rental agreement.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #382621 v.1